Mississippi, session 2026, HB4133.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Jared Scott Drennan of Covington County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector on July 24, 2007, in Covington County for the crime of Grand Larceny, for which he was sentenced to serve five (5) years probation within the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections, and for which he was released from probation on June 29, 2011. On July 9, 2018, he was sentenced in Harrison County for the crime of Possession of Controlled Substance with Intent, for which he was sentenced to serve fifteen (15) years and on July 15, 2019, and for Possession of a Firearm by Convicted Felon, for which he was sentenced to serve five (5) years, with both sentences to run concurrently. He was released on parole January 14, 2022, due to expiration of sentence.  The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.